Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.334

Rights-of-way to railroads and streetcar railways—Form of deed—Certified copy filed.

If such agreement is entered into, said board of regents shall transmit a certified copy thereof to the commissioner of public lands, who shall, after the full amount of money provided in such agreement shall be paid by said railroad company or streetcar company to the state treasurer, issue to such railroad company or streetcar company, in the name of the state of Washington, a deed for the right-of-way described in such agreement, which said deed shall recite and be subject to all the terms and conditions of such agreement, and certified copies of said deed shall be filed, one in the office of the commissioner of public lands, and the other with the secretary of said board of regents.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.334. Prior: 1909 c 248 s 3; RRS s 8097. Formerly RCW 28.77.260.]